test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv33_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    gleði+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: gleði
    gleði+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: gleði
    gleði+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: gleði
    gleði+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: gleði
    gleði+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: gleðir
    gleði+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: gleðin
    gleði+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: gleðina
    gleði+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: gleðini
    gleði+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: gleðinnar
    gleði+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: gleðirnar
